Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-402
Physician, defined.

The term physician shall include surgeon, and shall mean one legally authorized to practice his profession within the State of Nebraska and in good standing in his profession at the time.

Laws 1915, c. 210, § 3, p. 469;

C.S.1922, § 3236;

C.S.1929, § 52-402;

R.S.1943, § 52-402.

Under established rules of statutory construction, chiropractors are excluded by omission as health care professionals entitled to file a physician lien. Nelsen v. Grzywa, 9 Neb. App. 702, 618 N.W.2d 472 (2000).